Nebraska, session 109, LB1033.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1033 LB1033
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-1215, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-1215 (1) For purposes of determining eligibility of a household
for the low-income home energy assistance program pursuant to section
68-1201 as administered by the State of Nebraska pursuant to the federal
Energy Policy Act of 2005, 42 U.S.C. 8621 to 8630, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall apply a household total annual income
level of one hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level published
annually by the United States Department of Health and Human Services or
such successor agency which publishes the federal poverty level.
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services shall make crisis
assistance payments as necessary of no more than eight hundred dollars
per program year and may authorize crisis assistance payments for more
than eight hundred dollars per program year based on extenuating
circumstances.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-1215, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-